Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462C.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given to them. (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency. (c) "Fund" means a local housing trust fund or a regional housing trust fund. (d) "Local government" means any statutory or home rule charter citynew text begin , a housing and redevelopment authority,new text end or a county. (e) "Local housing trust fund" means a fund established by a local government with one or more dedicated sources of public revenue for housing. (f) "Regional housing trust fund" means a fund established and administered under a joint powers agreement entered into by two or more local governments with one or more dedicated sources of public revenue for housing.